Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1773
Share insurance.

No credit union organized under the Credit Union Act shall establish share accounts for any person other than a subscriber before the credit union has received a certificate of federal share insurance issued by the National Credit Union Administration under section 201 et seq., of the Federal Credit Union Act, 12 U.S.C. 1781 et seq.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 73.